Utah statutes.
16-16-1209.   Other claims against dissolved limited cooperative
association.
(1)  A dissolved limited cooperative association may publish notice of its
dissolution and request persons having claims against the association to
present them in accordance with the notice.
(2)  A notice under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  be published:
(i)  at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in
which the dissolved limited cooperative association's principal office is
located or, if the association does not have a principal office in this state,
in the county in which the association's designated office is or was last
located; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101;
(b)  describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide
an address to which the claim is to be sent; and
(c)  state that a claim against the association is barred unless an action to
enforce the claim is commenced not later than three years after publication of
the notice.
(3)  If a dissolved limited cooperative association publishes a notice in
accordance with Subsection (2), the claim of each of the following claimants
is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim not
later than three years after the first publication date of the notice:
(a)  a claimant that is entitled to but did not receive notice in a record
under Section 16-16-1208; and
(b)  a claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after
the effective date of dissolution.
(4)  A claim not barred under this section may be enforced:
(a)  against a dissolved limited cooperative association, to the extent of its
undistributed assets; or
(b)  if the association's assets have been distributed in connection with
winding up the association's activities against a member or holder of
financial rights to the extent of that person's proportionate share of the
claim or the association's assets distributed to the person in connection with
the winding up, whichever is less.  The person's total liability for all
claims under this Subsection (4) may not exceed the total amount of assets
distributed to the person as part of the winding up of the association.
